Nevada, session 83, SB458.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $773,148 for
an unanticipated shortfall related to travel, operating and
information services expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to
that made by section 5 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 1236.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)